Utah statutes.
63G-2-402.   Option for appealing a denial.

(1)  If the chief administrative officer of a governmental entity denies a records request under Section 63G-2-401, the requester may:

(a)  appeal the denial to the records committee as provided in Section 63G-2-403; or

(b)  petition for judicial review in district court as provided in Section 63G-2-404.

(2)  Any person aggrieved by a determination of the chief administrative officer of a governmental entity under this chapter, including persons who did not participate in the governmental entity's proceeding, may appeal the determination to the records committee as provided in Section 63G-2-403.

